Nevada, session 83, SB173.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 26, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. A food delivery service platform provider shall
provide the user with the option to request to receive disposable
foodware accessories or standard condiments from a food
dispensing establishment providing an online food order.
2. A food dispensing establishment that has a written
agreement with a food delivery service platform provider in
accordance with NRS 597.7635 shall not:
(a) Provide any disposable foodware accessories or standard
condiments packaged for single use to a user of the food delivery
service platform unless the disposable foodware accessories or
standard condiment was requested by the user; or
(b) Package or bundle disposable foodware accessories or
standard condiments for single use in a manner that prevents a
user from receiving only the disposable foodware accessories or
standard condiments that the user requested.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Disposable foodware accessory” means a single-use or
disposable fork, knife, spoon, spork, chopsticks, condiment cup or
packet, straw, stirrer, splash stick or cocktail stick. The term does
not include containers, bowls, plates, trays, cartons, cups or lids.
(b) “Standard condiments” means a relish, spice, sauce,
confection or seasoning that requires no additional preparation
and is generally used on a food item after preparation. The term
includes, without limitation, ketchup, mustard, mayonnaise, soy
sauce, hot sauce, salsa, salt, pepper, sugar and sugar substitutes.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB173_R3*

– 5 –
Sec. 5. As used in sections 5 to 26, inclusive, of this act, the
words and terms defined in sections 6 to 22, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. “Adult mattress” means any mattress other than a
toddler mattress, crib mattress or other sleep product for infants.
Sec. 7. “Carpet or rug” means a fabric product marketed or
intended for use as a floor covering in a household or business.
Sec. 8. “Component” means an identifiable component of a
product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product is
the manufacturer of the component.
Sec. 9. “Cookware” means a pot, pan, skillet, grill, baking
sheet, baking mold, tray, bowl or cooking utensil that is used in a
residence or kitchen to prepare, dispense or store food or
beverages.
Sec. 10. 1. “Cosmetic” means a product that is intended to
be rubbed onto or introduced into, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on
or otherwise applied to the human body for the purposes of
cleaning, cleansing, beautifying, promoting or altering the
appearance of a person, including, without limitation, any skin
moisturizer, perfume, lipstick, nail polish, eye or facial makeup,
shampoo, conditioner, permanent wave, hair dye or deodorant.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A product that requires a prescription for distribution or
dispensation; or
(b) Hydrofluoroolefins used as propellants in cosmetics.
Sec. 11. “Fabric treatment” means a product applied to
fabric to give the fabric one or more characteristics, including,
without limitation, stain resistance or water resistance. The term
does not include hydrofluoroolefins used as propellants in fabric
treatments.
Sec. 12. “Food packaging” means a package or packaging
component that is used in direct contact with food and is
composed, in substantial part, of paper, paperboard or other
materials originally derived from plant fibers.
Sec. 13. 1. “Intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances” means perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances that a manufacturer has intentionally
added to a product and that have a functional or technical effect
on the product. The term includes, without limitation,
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances that are intentional
breakdown products of an added chemical that also have a
functional or technical effect on the product.
2. The term does not include the use of recycled materials
which may contain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
-
*SB173_R3*

– 6 –
due to the use of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in
the original product.
Sec. 14. 1. “Juvenile product” means a product designed
by a manufacturer for use by an infant or child less than 12 years
of age, including, without limitation, a bassinet, child restraint
system for use in motor vehicles, changing pad, toddler mattress,
crib mattress or other sleep product for infants, high chair, infant
carrier, infant seat, polyurethane foam mat, pad or pillow, nap cot,
play mat, playpen or stroller.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Electronic products, including, without limitation, any
personal computer and any associated equipment, audio and video
equipment, calculator, wireless phone, gaming console, handheld
device incorporating a video screen or any associated peripheral
device such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply unit or power
cord;
(b) An internal component of a juvenile product that is not
designed or intended to come into direct contact with the skin or
mouth of a child as a result of the reasonably foreseeable use of
the product;
(c) An adult mattress; or
(d) An off-highway vehicle, as defined in NRS 490.060,
designed for use by a child, a replacement part for such an off-
highway vehicle and any protective clothing or equipment
intended for use by a child while operating such an off-highway
vehicle.
Sec. 15. “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures
or assembles a product. The term includes, without limitation, the
importer or first domestic distributor of the product if a product is
imported into the United States and the manufacturer does not
have a presence in the United States.
Sec. 16. “Package” means the material that is intended or
used to contain, protect, handle, deliver or present a product.
Sec. 17. “Packaging component” means an individual part
of a package, including, without limitation, the interior or exterior
blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior
strapping, coating, closure, ink or label.
Sec. 18. “Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 459.678.
Sec. 19. 1. “Product” means an item, and any component
of such an item, that is manufactured, assembled or otherwise
prepared for sale or distribution to a customer and that is sold or
distributed for personal, residential, commercial or industrial use,
including, without limitation, for use in making other products.
2. The term does not include:
-
*SB173_R3*

– 7 –
(a) Any drug, medical device, biologic or diagnostic regulated
by the United States Food and Drug Administration or the United
States Department of Agriculture;
(b) Any drug, medical device, biologic, parasiticide or
diagnostic administered or used to treat animals regulated by the
United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to the
Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.,
the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to the
Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 151 et seq. or the United
States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §§ 136 et
seq.;
(c) A veterinary pesticide product approved by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency for use in animals;
(d) Medical food, as defined in section 5(b)(3) of the Orphan
Drug Act, 21 U.S.C. § 360ee(b)(3);
(e) Infant formula, as defined in NRS 597.990;
(f) A motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment that is subject
to motor vehicle safety standards, as those terms are defined in 49
U.S.C. § 30102, set forth in the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration
of the United States Department of Transportation;
(g) Any packaging used for a product described in paragraphs
(a) to (f), inclusive; or
(h) A used product offered for sale or resale.
Sec. 20. “Textile” means any product made in whole or in
part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn or fabric, including,
without limitation, leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, nylon or
polyester. The term does not include any textile used in a medical,
professional or industrial setting.
Sec. 21. “Textile furnishing” means a type of textile intended
for use in households and businesses, including, without
limitation, any drapery, floor covering, furnishing, bedding, towel
or tablecloth. The term does not include a textile furnishing
intended for use in a medical, professional or industrial setting.
Sec. 22. “Upholstered furniture” means any article of
furniture that is:
1. Designed for sitting, resting or reclining; and
2. Wholly or partially stuffed with filling material.
Sec. 23. The provisions of sections 5 to 26, inclusive, of this
act do not apply to the extent that those provisions are preempted
by or conflict with federal law, including, without limitation, any
provision of federal law requiring the use of products that contain
intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
or authorizing the use of intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
-
*SB173_R3*

– 8 –
polyfluoroalkyl substances in a product or any product surface
that comes into contact with food or beverages.
Sec. 24. 1. A manufacturer shall not sell, offer for sale,
distribute for sale or distribute for use in this State any of the
following types of products if the product contains intentionally
added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances:
(a) Carpets or rugs;
(b) Fabric treatments;
(c) Food packaging;
(d) Juvenile products;
(e) Cosmetics;
(f) Indoor textile furnishings; or
(g) Indoor upholstered furniture.
2. A manufacturer of the products described in subsection 1
may include on the product label a sticker suitable to the size of
the product label stating “NO PFAS” to inform the consumer of
the product that the product does not contain intentionally added
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A product which contains perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances due to the use of recycled materials
containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in the
original product;
(b) A carpet or rug that was manufactured or imported before
January 1, 2026; or
(c) Any other textile product, other than a carpet or rug, that
was manufactured or imported before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 25. 1. A manufacturer of cookware sold in this State
that contains intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances in the handle of the product or in any
product surface that comes into contact with any food or
beverages shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, list the
presence of those substances on the product label. The list of such
substances must be prefaced by the phrase “This product
contains:”;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, include on
the product label a statement, in both English and Spanish, that
reads: “For more information about chemicals in this product,
visit” followed by:
(1) An Internet address for a website that provides
information about why the perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances are intentionally added; and
(2) A two dimensional bar code, commonly known as a QR
code or other machine-readable code used for storing an Internet
-
*SB173_R3*

– 9 –
address for the website that provides information about why the
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances are intentionally
added;
(c) Include in any product listing for online sales in this State,
the information required to be included on the product label
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b); and
(d) Ensure that the information required pursuant to
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) is clearly visible and legible to the
consumer on the label and on the product listing for online sales.
2. A manufacturer of cookware:
(a) Shall not claim on the packaging for cookware that the
cookware is free of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances,
unless no individual perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl compound
has been intentionally added to the cookware.
(b) That does not contain intentionally added perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances may include on the product label a
sticker suitable to the size of the product stating “NO PFAS” to
inform the consumer of the product that the product does not
contain intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances.
3. Cookware that meets the following requirements is exempt
from the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1:
(a) The surface area of the cookware cannot fit a product label
of at least 2 square inches; and
(b) The cookware does not have:
(1) An exterior or wrapper on which a product label can
appear or be affixed; or
(2) A tag or other attachment with information about the
product attached to the cookware.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
manufacturer shall not sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale or
distribute for use any cookware that contains one or more
intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
in the handle of the product or in any product surface that comes
into contact with food or beverages, unless the manufacturer and
the cookware comply with the requirements of this section.
Sec. 26. A person who willfully and knowingly violates the
provisions of section 24 or 25 of this act is subject to a civil penalty
of not more than $1,000 for each violation.
Sec. 27. NRS 597.7625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
597.7625 As used in NRS 597.7625 to 597.7642, inclusive,
and section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 597.7626 to 597.7634, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB173_R3*

– 10 –
Sec. 28. NRS 597.7642 is hereby amended to read as follows:
597.7642 A person who knowingly violates NRS 597.7639,
597.764 or 597.7641 or section 2 of this act is deemed to have
committed a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of NRS
598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
Sec. 29. Chapter 279 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. For the purposes of this chapter, the existence of heat
islands in a redevelopment area may be considered blight. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, an agency that receives
revenue pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 279.676
from taxes on the taxable property in the redevelopment area
affected by the ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS
279.676 shall set aside 1 percent of the revenue received on or
after October 1, 2025, to increase, improve or enhance
landscaping in existing neighborhoods of the community in order
to provide shade and reduce heat island effects in such
neighborhoods. For the purposes of providing shade and reducing
heat island effects, the agency shall:
(a) Establish requirements to plant trees to provide shade,
which must include, without limitation, a review of the orientation
of the layout of existing buildings in the neighborhood and
planning to promote heat reduction and the creation of canopies;
(b) Create a system to track the seedling type, planting and life
cycle for all trees planted as a result of this section;
(c) If feasible, build or install structures to promote shade and
reduce heat island effects based on available scientific studies on
the reduction of heat island effects; and
(d) Partner with the Southern Nevada Heat Resilience Lab at
the Desert Research Institute to convene a working group,
comprised of, without limitation, governmental entities and
nonprofit organizations with experience relating to mitigating heat
island effects to develop and implement a strategy to mitigate heat
island effects in the redevelopment area.
2. The money set aside pursuant to subsection 1 must be
dispersed by the agency in continuing grant increments to the
partners of the agency convened pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of subsection 1.
3. For each fiscal year, the agency shall prepare a written
report concerning the amount of money expended for the purposes
set forth in subsection 1 and shall:
(a) Submit a copy of the report to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Government Affairs, if the report is
received during an odd-numbered year, or to the next session of
-
*SB173_R3*

– 11 –
the Legislature, if the report is received during an even-numbered
year; and
(b) Present the results of the report and any updates to the
results to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Government
Affairs upon the request of the Chair of the Committee; and
(2) The Assembly and Senate Standing Committees on
Government Affairs of the Legislature upon the request of the
Chairs of the Committees.
4. The obligation of an agency pursuant to subsection 1 to set
aside 1 percent of the revenue allocated to and received by the
agency pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 279.676
is subordinate to any existing obligations of the agency. As used in
this subsection, “existing obligations” means the principal and
interest, when due, on any bonds, notes or other indebtedness
whether funded, refunded, assumed or otherwise incurred by an
agency before October 1, 2025, to finance or refinance in whole or
in part, the redevelopment of a redevelopment area. For the
purposes of this subsection, obligations incurred by an agency on
or after October 1, 2025, shall be deemed existing obligations if
the net proceeds are used to refinance existing obligations of the
agency.
Sec. 30. NRS 279.680 is hereby amended to read as follows:
279.680 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
279.676 and NRS 279.685 and 279.6855 [,] and section 29 of this
act, in any redevelopment plan, or in the proceedings for the
advance of money, or the making of loans, or the incurring of any
indebtedness, whether funded, refunded, assumed or otherwise, by
the redevelopment agency to finance or refinance, in whole or in
part, the redevelopment project, the portion of taxes mentioned in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 279.676 may be irrevocably
pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on those
loans, advances or indebtedness.
Sec. 31. NRS 374.358 is hereby amended to read as follows:
374.358 1. A person who maintains a business or intends to
locate a business in a historically underutilized business zone, as
defined in 15 U.S.C. § 632, redevelopment area created pursuant to
NRS 279.382 to 279.687, inclusive, and section 29 of this act, area
eligible for a community development block grant pursuant to 24
C.F.R. Part 570 or enterprise community established pursuant to 24
C.F.R. Part 597 in this State may, pursuant to the applicable
provisions of NRS 274.310, 274.320 or 274.330, apply to the Office
of Economic Development for an abatement from the taxes imposed
by this chapter on the gross receipts from the sale, and the storage,
use or other consumption, of eligible machinery or equipment for
-
*SB173_R3*

– 12 –
use by a business which has been approved for an abatement
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320 or 274.330.
2. If an application for an abatement is approved pursuant to
NRS 274.310, 274.320 or 274.330:
(a) The taxpayer is eligible for an abatement from the tax
imposed by this chapter for a duration of not less than 1 year but not
more than 5 years.
(b) The abatement must be administered and carried out in the
manner set forth in the applicable provisions of NRS 274.310,
274.320 or 274.330.
3. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “eligible machinery or equipment” means machinery or
equipment for which a deduction is authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 179. The term does not include:
(a) Buildings or the structural components of buildings;
(b) Equipment used by a public utility;
(c) Equipment used for medical treatment;
(d) Machinery or equipment used in mining; or
(e) Machinery or equipment used in gaming.
Sec. 32. NRS 414.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.040 1. A Division of Emergency Management is hereby
created within the Office of the Military. The Chief of the Division
is appointed by and holds office at the pleasure of the Adjutant
General of the Office of the Military. The Division is the State
Agency for Emergency Management and the State Agency for Civil
Defense for the purposes of the Compact ratified by the Legislature
pursuant to NRS 415.010. The Chief is the State’s Director of
Emergency Management and the State’s Director of Civil Defense
for the purposes of that Compact.
2. The Chief may employ technical, clerical, stenographic and
other personnel as may be required, and may make such
expenditures therefor and for other expenses of his or her office
within the appropriation therefor, or from other money made
available to him or her for purposes of emergency management, as
may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
3. The Chief, subject to the direction and control of the
Adjutant General, shall carry out the program for emergency
management in this State. The Chief shall coordinate the activities
of all organizations for emergency management within the State,
maintain liaison with and cooperate with agencies and organizations
of other states and of the Federal Government for emergency
management and carry out such additional duties as may be
prescribed by the Adjutant General.
4. The Chief shall assist in the development of comprehensive,
coordinated plans for emergency management by adopting an
-
*SB173_R3*

– 13 –
integrated process, using the partnership of governmental entities,
business and industry, volunteer organizations and other interested
persons, for the mitigation of, preparation for, response to and
recovery from emergencies or disasters. In adopting this process, the
Chief shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 232.3532, develop
written plans for the mitigation of, preparation for, response to and
recovery from emergencies and disasters. The plans developed by
the Chief pursuant to this paragraph must include the information
prescribed in NRS 414.041 to 414.044, inclusive.
(b) Conduct activities designed to:
(1) Eliminate or reduce the probability that an emergency
will occur or to reduce the effects of unavoidable disasters;
(2) Prepare state and local governmental agencies, private
organizations and other persons to be capable of responding
appropriately if an emergency or disaster occurs by fostering the
adoption of plans for emergency operations, conducting exercises to
test those plans, training necessary personnel and acquiring
necessary resources;
(3) Test periodically plans for emergency operations to
ensure that the activities of state and local governmental agencies,
private organizations and other persons are coordinated;
(4) Provide assistance to victims, prevent further injury or
damage to persons or property and increase the effectiveness of
recovery operations; and
(5) Restore the operation of vital community life-support
systems and return persons and property affected by an emergency
or disaster to a condition that is comparable to or better than what
existed before the emergency or disaster occurred.
5. In addition to any other requirement concerning the program
of emergency management in this State, the Chief shall:
(a) Maintain an inventory of any state or local services,
equipment, supplies, personnel and other resources related to
participation in the Nevada Intrastate Mutual Aid System
established pursuant to NRS 414A.100;
(b) Coordinate the provision of resources and equipment within
this State in response to requests for mutual aid pursuant to NRS
414.075 or chapter 414A of NRS;
(c) Coordinate with state agencies, local governments, Indian
tribes or nations and special districts to use the personnel and
equipment of those state agencies, local governments, Indian tribes
or nations and special districts as agents of the State during a
response to a request for mutual aid pursuant to NRS 414.075 or
414A.130; and
(d) Provide notice:
-
*SB173_R3*

– 14 –
(1) On or before February 15 of each year to the governing
body of each political subdivision of whether the political
subdivision has complied with the requirements of NRS 239C.250;
(2) On or before February 15 of each year to the Chair of the
Public Utilities Commission of Nevada of whether each utility that
is not a governmental utility and each provider of new electric
resources has complied with the requirements of NRS 239C.270;
(3) On or before February 15 of each year to the Governor of
whether each governmental utility described in subsection 1 of NRS
239C.050 and each provider of new electric resources has complied
with the requirements of NRS 239C.270;
(4) On or before February 15 of each year to the governing
body of each governmental utility described in subsection 2 of NRS
239C.050 and each provider of new electric resources of whether
each such governmental utility has complied with the requirements
of NRS 239C.270;
(5) On or before November 15 of each year to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction of whether each board of
trustees of a school district, governing body of a charter school or
governing body of a private school has complied with the
requirements of NRS 388.243 or 394.1687, as applicable; and
(6) On or before November 15 of each year to the Chair of
the Nevada Gaming Control Board of whether each resort hotel has
complied with the requirements of NRS 463.790.
6. The Division shall:
(a) Perform the duties required pursuant to chapter 415A of
NRS;
(b) Perform the duties required pursuant to NRS 353.2753 at the
request of a state agency or local government;
(c) Adopt regulations setting forth the manner in which federal
funds received by the Division to finance projects related to
emergency management and homeland security are allocated, except
with respect to any funds committed by specific statute to the
regulatory authority of another person or agency, including, without
limitation, funds accepted by the State Emergency Response
Commission pursuant to NRS 459.740; [and]
(d) Where appropriate and applicable, apply for grants of
money from the Federal Government or other sources that will
assist in the reduction of heat island effects where such heat
island effects would threaten the health and safety of residents of
this State and may result in or worsen an emergency or disaster;
and
(e) Submit a written report to the Nevada Commission on
Homeland Security within 60 days of making a grant of money to a
state agency, political subdivision or tribal government to pay for a
-
*SB173_R3*

– 15 –
project or program relating to the prevention of, detection of,
mitigation of, preparedness for, response to and recovery from acts
of terrorism that includes, without limitation:
(1) The total amount of money that the state agency, political
subdivision or tribal government has been approved to receive for
the project or program;
(2) A description of the project or program; and
(3) An explanation of how the money may be used by the
state agency, political subdivision or tribal government.
7. The Division shall develop a written guide for the
preparation and maintenance of an emergency response plan to
assist a person or governmental entity that is required to file a plan
pursuant to NRS 239C.250, 239C.270, 388.243, 394.1687 or
463.790. The Division shall review the guide on an annual basis and
revise the guide if necessary. On or before January 15 of each year,
the Division shall post the guide on a publicly accessible Internet
website maintained by the Division.
8. The Division shall provide a copy of the written guide
developed pursuant to subsection 7 to a person or governmental
entity that is required to file a plan pursuant to NRS 239C.250,
239C.270, 388.243, 394.1687 or 463.790 upon the request of such a
person or entity.
Sec. 33. NRS 414.093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
414.093 1. Any state emergency management plan prepared
pursuant to NRS 414.060 and each plan for emergency operations
specified in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of
NRS 414.040 that is adopted by a state or local governmental
agency must:
(a) Be developed and executed in collaboration with persons and
organizations that advocate for the needs of victims of emergencies
and disasters; and
(b) Include, without limitation:
(1) Plans for providing assistance to victims of emergencies
or disasters;
(2) Procedures for coordinating and accepting donations on
behalf of such victims of emergencies or disasters, including,
without limitation, procedures that allow donations to be accepted in
a manner that is convenient for donors and have low administrative
costs; [and]
(3) Plans for mitigating any severe heat experienced by
victims of emergencies or disasters; and
(4) Other provisions recommended by the Office for Victims
of Crime of the United States Department of Justice for helping
victims of mass violence and terrorism.
-
*SB173_R3*

– 16 –
2. Any state emergency management plan prepared pursuant to
NRS 414.060 must include, without limitation, a prescribed chain of
command that includes each person responsible for overseeing or
executing any part of the response to an emergency or disaster.
Sec. 33.3. Chapter 446 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each food establishment shall ensure that each food-
contact surface in the food establishment, including, without
limitation, a cutting board, is maintained in good repair and free
from excessive wear, signs of which may include, without
limitation, chips, grooves, cracks, pits or any other condition that
impacts the ability to clean the food-contact surface or poses a risk
for bacterial retention.
2. A health authority shall visually inspect the condition and
sanitation of all food-contact surfaces during any routine
inspections of the food establishment performed by the health
authority in accordance with the protocols of the health authority
for such inspections and the recommendations set forth in the
Food Code published by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
3. The health authority may adopt any requirements or
protocols necessary for the inspection of food-contact surfaces to
align the protocols of the health authority with the Food Code
published by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
federal law or best practices in food safety.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose
additional requirements on a health authority to perform
inspections or take enforcement actions relating to food
establishments beyond the requirements adopted by the health
authority before July 1, 2027, if such requirements and protocols
include the inspection of food-contact surfaces in a food
establishment.
5. As used in this section, “food-contact surface” means:
(a) The surface of equipment or a utensil with which food
normally comes into contact; or
(b) The surface of equipment or a utensil from which food
may drain, drip or splash back onto food or a surface normally in
contact with food.
Sec. 33.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. Chapter 644A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In any county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
Board shall collect and test random samples sold or offered for
sale at retail stores for hair products in the county of packaged:
-
*SB173_R3*

– 17 –
(a) Hair products to determine if the hair products contain
formaldehyde; and
(b) Braid hair, weaves and extensions to determine if the braid
hair, weaves or extensions contain known carcinogens.
2. The Board may contract or enter into a memorandum of
understanding with a testing laboratory to conduct the testing
required by subsection 1.
3. As used in this section, “retail store for hair products”
means a retail establishment in which 90 percent or more of the
business of the establishment involves the sale of hair products,
braid hair, weaves or extensions.
Sec. 35. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Center for Applied Research of the
University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of $75,000 to develop a
scientific test to determine whether packaged synthetic hair braids
contain formaldehyde and to purchase any equipment and
equipment warranties necessary to develop and perform the test.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 36. 1. The State Board of Cosmetology may enter into a
memorandum of understanding with the Nevada System of Higher
Education, on behalf of the Nevada Center for Applied Research of
the University of Nevada, Reno, relating to the testing required by
section 34 of this act. A memorandum of understanding entered into
pursuant to this section must require:
(a) The staff of the Board to:
(1) Collect the random samples pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 34 of this act and transmit the samples to the Nevada Center
for Applied Research; and
(2) Receive training from the staff of the Nevada Center for
Applied Research on collecting the necessary number of samples;
and
(b) The Nevada Center for Applied Research to:
(1) Test the random samples within a period of time
specified in the memorandum;
(2) Provide a written report to the State Board of
Cosmetology with the results of the testing; and
-
*SB173_R3*

– 18 –
(3) Prepare an invoice to the Board for each batch of samples
tested.
2. If the State Board of Cosmetology enters into a
memorandum of understanding pursuant to subsection 1, on or
before December 31, 2026, the State Board of Cosmetology shall
submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature which includes the
results of the written report that the Board received pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
Sec. 37. A redevelopment agency that is subject to the
requirements established by section 29 of this act shall:
1. Establish partnerships with the Southern Nevada Water
Authority, the Desert Research Institute of the Nevada System of
Higher Education and the Cooperative Extension Service of the
University of Nevada, Reno, to identify drought tolerant trees to
plant that will provide shade, conserve water and reduce heat island
effects in accordance with the requirements of section 29 of this act;
2. Contract with an arborist or the Cooperative Extension
Service of the University of Nevada, Reno, to identify and purchase
tree seedlings for planting; and
3. On or before September 30, 2028, disperse any money that
is set aside pursuant to section 29 of this act in continuing grant
increments to the partners of the agency convened pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of section 29 of this act to carry out
the provisions of section 29 of this act.
Sec. 38. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 39. 1. This section and section 38 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 34, 35 and 36 of this act become effective on
July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 32 and 33 of this act become effective on
October 1, 2025.
4. Sections 29, 30, 31 and 37 of this act become effective on
October 1, 2025, and expire by limitation on September 30, 2028.
5. Sections 1 to 28, inclusive, of this act become effective on
January 1, 2026.
6. Sections 33.3 and 33.7 of this act become effective on
July 1, 2027.
H
-
*SB173_R3*